apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="/essere__vbser">
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>esser</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>essere</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fui</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fosti</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>foste</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fu</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>furon</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>furono</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sarei</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>saresti</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sarebbe</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>saremmo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sareste</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>sarebber</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sarebbero</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>fosser</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>siamo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sono</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sei</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>è</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>siamo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>siete</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>son</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sono</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>saremo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fossimo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sarò</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fossi</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sarete</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>foste</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sarai</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fossi</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>saran</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>saranno</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sarà</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fummo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fosse</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>fossero</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>siete</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sei</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sia</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sia</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sia</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>siamo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>siate</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>sian</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>siano</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ero</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>eri</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>era</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>eravamo</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>eravate</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>eran</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>erano</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ero</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>stato</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>stati</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>stata</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>state</l>
	  <r>essere<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="essere"><par n="/essere__vbser"/></e>
